California statutes. Vehicle Code
“NOTICE TO DEALER: Your franchise agreement is being modified or replaced. If the modification or replacement will substantially affect your sales or service obligations or investment, you have the right to file a protest with the NEW MOTOR VEHICLE BOARD in Sacramento and have a hearing in which you may protest the proposed modification or replacement of your franchise under provisions of the California Vehicle Code. You must file your protest with the board within 30 calendar days of your receipt of this notice or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor or your protest rights will be waived.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 662, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3061.

In determining whether good cause has been established for modifying, replacing, terminating, or refusing to continue a franchise, the board shall take into consideration the existing circumstances, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Amount of business transacted by the franchisee, as compared to the business available to the franchisee.

(b) Investment necessarily made and obligations incurred by the franchisee to perform its part of the franchise.

(c) Permanency of the investment.

(d) Whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare for the franchise to be modified or replaced or the business of the franchisee disrupted.

(e) Whether the franchisee has adequate motor vehicle sales and service facilities, equipment, vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel to reasonably provide for the needs of the consumers for the motor vehicles handled by the franchisee and has been and is rendering adequate services to the public.

(f) Whether the franchisee fails to fulfill the warranty obligations of the franchisor to be performed by the franchisee.

(g) Extent of franchisee’s failure to comply with the terms of the franchise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 160.)
-------------------------------------------

3062.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), if a franchisor seeks to enter into a franchise establishing an additional motor vehicle dealership, or seeks to relocate an existing motor vehicle dealership, that has a relevant market area within which the same line-make is represented, the franchisor shall, in writing, first notify the board and each franchisee in that line-make in the relevant market area of the franchisor’s intention to establish an additional dealership or to relocate an existing dealership. Within 20 days of receiving the notice, satisfying the requirements of this section, or within 20 days after the end of an appeal procedure provided by the franchisor,
 a franchisee required to be given the notice may file with the board a protest to the proposed dealership establishment or relocation described in the franchisor’s notice. If, within this time, a franchisee files with the board a request for additional time to file a protest, the board or its executive director, upon a showing of good cause, may grant an additional 10 days to file the protest. When a protest is filed, the board shall inform the franchisor that a timely protest has been filed, that a hearing is required pursuant to Section 3066, and that the franchisor may not establish the proposed dealership or relocate the existing dealership until the board has held a hearing as provided in Section 3066, nor thereafter, if the board has determined that there is good cause for not permitting the establishment of the proposed dealership or relocation of the existing dealership. In the event of multiple
 protests, hearings may be consolidated to expedite the disposition of the issue.

(2) If a franchisor seeks to enter into a franchise that authorizes a satellite warranty facility to be established at, or relocated to, a proposed location that is within two miles of a dealership of the same line-make, the franchisor shall first give notice in writing of the franchisor’s intention to establish or relocate a satellite warranty facility at the proposed location to the board and each franchisee operating a dealership of the same line-make within two miles of the proposed location. Within 20 days of receiving the notice satisfying the requirements of this section, or within 20 days after the end of an appeal procedure provided by the franchisor, a franchisee required to be given the notice may file with the board a protest to the establishing or
 relocating of the satellite warranty facility. If, within this time, a franchisee files with the board a request for additional time to file a protest, the board or its executive director, upon a showing of good cause, may grant an additional 10 days to file the protest. When a protest is filed, the board shall inform the franchisor that a timely protest has been filed, that a hearing is required pursuant to Section 3066, and that the franchisor may not establish or relocate the proposed satellite warranty facility until the board has held a hearing as provided in Section 3066, nor thereafter, if the board has determined that there is good cause for not permitting the satellite warranty facility. In the event of multiple protests, hearings may be consolidated to expedite the disposition of the issue.

(3) The written notice shall
 contain, on the first page thereof in at least 12-point bold type and circumscribed by a line to segregate it from the rest of the text, the following statement:
“NOTICE TO DEALER: You have the right to file a protest with the NEW MOTOR VEHICLE BOARD in Sacramento and have a hearing on your protest under the terms of the California Vehicle Code if you oppose this action. You must file your protest with the board within 20 days of your receipt of this notice, or within 20 days after the end of any appeal procedure that is provided by us to you. If within this time you file with the board a request for additional time to file a protest, the board or its executive director, upon a showing of good cause, may grant you an additional 10 days to file the protest.”
(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to either of the following:

(1) The relocation of an existing dealership to a location that is both within the same city as, and within one mile from, the existing
 dealership location.

(2) The establishment at a location that is both within the same city as, and within one-quarter mile from, the location of a dealership of the same line-make that has been out of operation for less than 90 days.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a display of vehicles at a fair, exposition, or similar exhibit if actual sales are not made at the event and the display does not exceed 30 days. This subdivision may not be construed to prohibit a new vehicle dealer from establishing a branch office for the purpose of selling vehicles at the fair, exposition, or similar exhibit, even though the event is sponsored by a financial institution, as defined in Section 31041 of the Financial Code or by a financial institution and a licensed dealer.
 The establishment of these branch offices, however, shall be in accordance with subdivision (a) where applicable.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the reopening of a dealership that has not been in operation for one year or more shall be deemed the establishment of an additional motor vehicle dealership.

(e) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Motor vehicle dealership” or “dealership” means an authorized facility at which a franchisee offers for sale or lease, displays for sale or lease, or sells or leases new motor vehicles.

(2) “Satellite warranty facility” means a facility operated by a franchisee where authorized warranty repairs and
 service are performed and the offer for sale or lease, the display for sale or lease, or the sale or lease of new motor vehicles is not authorized to take place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 512, Sec. 10.   (SB 155)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.

In determining whether good cause has been established for not entering into a franchise or relocating an existing dealership of the same line-make, the board shall take into consideration the existing circumstances, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Permanency of the investment.

(b) Effect on the retail motor vehicle business and the consuming public in the relevant market area.

(c) Whether it is injurious to the public welfare for an additional franchise to be established or an existing dealership to be relocated.

(d) Whether the franchisees of the same line-make in the relevant market area are providing adequate competition and convenient consumer care for the motor vehicles of the line-make in the market area, which shall include the adequacy of motor vehicle sales and service facilities, equipment, supply of vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel.

(e) Whether the establishment of an additional franchise would increase competition and therefore be in the public interest.

(f) For purposes of this section, the terms “motor vehicle dealership” and “dealership” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 3062.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 512, Sec. 11.   (SB 155)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3064.

(a) Every franchisor shall specify to its franchisees the delivery and preparation obligations of the franchisees prior to delivery of new motor vehicles to retail buyers. A copy of the delivery and preparation obligations, which shall constitute the franchisee’s only responsibility for product liability between the franchisee and the franchisor but shall not in any way affect the franchisee’s responsibility for product liability between the purchaser and either the franchisee or the franchisor, and a schedule of compensation to be paid to franchisees for the work and services they shall be required to perform in connection with those delivery and preparation obligations shall be filed with the board by franchisors,
 and shall constitute the compensation as set forth on the schedule. The schedule of compensation shall be reasonable, with the reasonableness thereof being subject to the approval of the board, if a franchisee files a notice of protest with the board. In determining the reasonableness of the schedules, the board shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the time required to perform each function that the dealer is obligated to perform and the appropriate labor rate.

(b) Upon delivery of the vehicle, the franchisee shall give a copy of the delivery and preparation obligations to the purchaser and a written certification that the franchisee has fulfilled these obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 512, Sec. 12.   (SB 155)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3065.

(a) Every franchisor shall properly fulfill every warranty agreement made by it and adequately and fairly compensate each of its franchisees for labor and parts used to satisfy the warranty obligations of the franchisor, including, but not limited to, diagnostics, repair, and servicing and shall file a copy of its warranty reimbursement schedule with the board. The warranty reimbursement schedule shall be reasonable with respect to the time and compensation allowed to the franchisee for the warranty diagnostics, repair, servicing, and all other conditions of the obligation, including costs directly associated with the disposal of hazardous materials that are associated with a warranty repair.

(1) The franchisor shall use time allowances for the diagnosis and performance of work and service that are reasonable and adequate for a qualified technician to perform the work or services.
 A franchisor shall not unreasonably deny a written request submitted by a franchisee for modification of a franchisor’s uniform time allowance for a specific warranty repair, or a request submitted by a franchisee for an additional time allowance for either diagnostic or repair work on a specific vehicle covered under warranty, provided the request includes any information and documentation reasonably required by the franchisor to assess the merits of the franchisee’s request.

(2) A franchisor shall not replace, modify, or supplement the warranty reimbursement schedule to impose a fixed percentage or
 other reduction in the time or compensation allowed to the franchisee for warranty repairs not attributable to a specific repair. A franchisor may reduce the allowed time or compensation applicable to a specific warranty repair only upon 15 days’ prior written notice to the franchisee.

(3) Any protest challenging a reduction in time or compensation applicable to specific parts or labor operations shall be filed within six months following the franchisee’s receipt of notice of the reduction, and the franchisor shall have the burden of establishing the reasonableness of the reduction and adequacy and fairness of the resulting reduction in time or compensation.

(b) In determining what constitutes a reasonable warranty reimbursement schedule under this section, a
 franchisor shall compensate each of its franchisees for parts and labor at rates equal to the franchisee’s retail labor rate and retail parts rate, as established pursuant to Section 3065.2. Nothing in this subdivision prohibits a franchisee and a franchisor from entering into a voluntary written agreement signed by both parties that compensates for labor and parts used to satisfy the warranty obligations of the franchisor at rates other than the franchisee’s retail rates, provided that the warranty reimbursement schedule adequately and fairly compensates the franchisee.

(c) If any franchisor disallows a franchisee’s claim for a defective part, alleging that the part, in fact, is not defective, the franchisor shall return the part alleged not to be defective to the franchisee at the expense of the franchisor, or the franchisee shall be
 reimbursed for the franchisee’s cost of the part, at the franchisor’s option.

(d) (1) All claims made by franchisees pursuant to this section shall be either approved or disapproved within 30 days after their receipt by the franchisor. Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within 30 days from receipt by the franchisor shall be deemed approved on the 30th day. All claims made by franchisees under this section and Section 3064 for labor and parts shall be paid within 30 days after approval.

(2) A franchisor shall not disapprove a claim unless the claim is false or fraudulent, repairs were not properly made, repairs were inappropriate to correct a nonconformity with the written warranty due to an improper act or omission of the franchisee, or for material noncompliance
 with reasonable and nondiscriminatory documentation and administrative claims submission requirements.

(3) When any claim is disapproved, the franchisee who submits it shall be notified in writing of its disapproval within the required period, and each notice shall state the specific grounds upon which the disapproval is based. The franchisor shall provide for a reasonable appeal process allowing the franchisee at least 30 days after receipt of the written disapproval notice to provide additional supporting documentation or information rebutting the disapproval. If disapproval is based upon noncompliance with documentation or administrative claims submission requirements, the franchisor shall allow the franchisee at least 30 days from the date of receipt of the notice to cure any material noncompliance. If the disapproval is rebutted, and
 material noncompliance is cured before the applicable deadline, the franchisor shall approve the claim.

(4) If the franchisee provides additional supporting documentation or information purporting to rebut the disapproval, attempts to cure noncompliance relating to the claim, or otherwise appeals denial of the claim and the franchisor continues to deny the claim, the franchisor shall provide the franchisee with a written notification of the final denial within 30 days of completion of the appeal process, which shall conspicuously state “Final Denial” on the first page.

(5) Failure to approve or pay within the above specified time limits, in individual instances for reasons beyond the reasonable control of the franchisor, shall not constitute a violation of this article.

(6) Within six months after either receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (3) or (4), whichever is later, a franchisee may file a protest with the board for determination of whether the franchisor complied with the requirements of this subdivision. In any protest pursuant to this subdivision, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof.

(e) (1) Audits of franchisee warranty records may be conducted by the franchisor on a reasonable basis for a period of nine months after a claim is paid or credit issued. A franchisor shall not select a franchisee for an audit, or perform an audit, in a punitive, retaliatory, or unfairly discriminatory manner. A franchisor may conduct no more than one random audit of a franchisee in a nine-month period. The
 franchisor’s notification to the franchisee of any additional audit within a nine-month period shall be accompanied by written disclosure of the basis for that additional audit.

(2) Previously approved claims shall not be disapproved or charged back to the franchisee unless the claim is false or fraudulent, repairs were not properly made, repairs were
 inappropriate to correct a nonconformity with the written warranty due to an improper act or omission of the franchisee, or for material noncompliance with reasonable and nondiscriminatory documentation and administrative claims submission requirements. A franchisor shall not disapprove or chargeback a claim based upon an extrapolation from a sample of claims, unless the sample of claims is selected randomly and the extrapolation is performed in a reasonable and statistically valid manner.

(3) If the franchisor disapproves of a previously approved claim following an audit, the franchisor shall provide to the franchisee, within 30 days after the audit, a written disapproval notice stating the specific grounds upon which the claim is disapproved. The franchisor shall provide a reasonable appeal process allowing the franchisee
 a reasonable period of not less than 30 days after receipt of the written disapproval notice to respond to any disapproval
 with additional supporting documentation or information rebutting the disapproval and to cure noncompliance, with the period to be commensurate with the volume of claims under consideration. If the franchisee rebuts any disapproval and cures any material noncompliance relating to a claim before the applicable deadline, the franchisor shall not chargeback the franchisee for that claim.

(4) If the franchisee provides additional supporting documentation or information purporting to rebut the disapproval, attempts to cure noncompliance relating to the claim, or otherwise appeals denial of the claim and the franchisor continues to deny the claim, the franchisor shall provide the franchisee with a written notification of the final denial within 30 days of completion of the appeal process, which shall conspicuously state “Final Denial” on the
 first page.

(5) The franchisor shall not chargeback the franchisee until 45 days after receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (3) or paragraph (4), whichever is later. Any chargeback to a franchisee for warranty parts or service compensation shall be made within 90 days of receipt of that written notice. If the franchisee files a protest pursuant to this subdivision prior to the franchisor’s chargeback for denied claims, the franchisor shall not offset or otherwise undertake to collect the chargeback until the board issues a final order on the protest. If the board sustains the chargeback or the protest is dismissed, the franchisor shall have 90 days following issuance of the final order or the dismissal to make the chargeback, unless otherwise provided in a settlement agreement.

(6) Within six months after either receipt of the written disapproval notice or completion of the franchisor’s appeal process, whichever is later, a franchisee may file a protest with the board
 for determination of whether the franchisor complied with this subdivision. In any protest pursuant to this subdivision, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof.

(f) If a false claim was submitted by a franchisee with the intent to defraud the franchisor, a longer period for audit and any resulting chargeback may be permitted if the franchisor obtains an order from the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 11.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3065.1.

(a) All claims made by a franchisee for payment under the terms of a franchisor incentive program shall be either approved or disapproved within 30 days after receipt by the franchisor. When any claim is disapproved, the franchisee who submits it shall be notified in writing of its disapproval within the required period, and each notice shall state the specific grounds upon which the disapproval is based. Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within 30 days from receipt shall be deemed approved on the 30th day.

(b) Franchisee claims for incentive program compensation shall not be disapproved unless the claim is false or fraudulent, the
 claim
 is ineligible under the terms of the incentive program as previously communicated to the franchisee, or for material noncompliance with reasonable and nondiscriminatory documentation and administrative claims submission requirements.

(c) The franchisor shall provide for a reasonable appeal process allowing the franchisee at least 30 days after receipt of the written disapproval notice to respond to any disapproval with additional supporting documentation or information rebutting the disapproval. If disapproval is based upon noncompliance with documentation or administrative claims submission requirements, the
 franchisor shall allow the franchisee at least 30 days from the date of receipt of the written disapproval notice to cure any material noncompliance. If the disapproval is rebutted, and material noncompliance is cured before the applicable deadline, the franchisor shall approve the claim.

(d) If the franchisee provides additional supporting documentation or information purporting to rebut the disapproval, attempts to cure noncompliance relating to the claim, or otherwise appeals denial of the claim, and the franchisor continues to deny the claim, the franchisor shall provide the franchisee with a written notification of the final denial within 30 days of completion of the appeal process, which shall conspicuously state “Final Denial” on the first page.

(e) Following
 the disapproval of a claim, a franchisee shall have
 six months from receipt of the written notice described in either subdivision (a) or (d), whichever is later, to file a protest with the board for determination of whether the franchisor complied with subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d). In any hearing pursuant to this subdivision or subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), the franchisor shall have the burden of proof.

(f) All claims made by franchisees under this section shall be paid within 30 days following approval. Failure to approve or pay within the above specified time limits, in individual instances for reasons beyond the reasonable control of the franchisor, do not constitute a violation of this article.

(g) (1) Audits of franchisee incentive records may be conducted by the franchisor on a
 reasonable basis, and for a period of nine months after a claim is paid or credit issued. A franchisor shall not select a franchisee for an audit, or perform an audit, in a punitive, retaliatory, or unfairly discriminatory manner. A franchisor may conduct no more than one random audit of a franchisee in a nine-month period. The franchisor’s notification to the franchisee of any additional audit within a nine-month period shall be accompanied by written disclosure of the basis for that additional audit.

(2) Previously approved claims shall not be disapproved and charged back unless the claim is false or fraudulent, the claim is ineligible under the terms of the incentive program as previously communicated to the franchisee, or for material noncompliance with reasonable and nondiscriminatory documentation and administrative claims
 submission requirements. A franchisor shall not disapprove a claim or chargeback a claim based upon an extrapolation from a sample of claims, unless the sample of claims is selected randomly and the extrapolation is performed in a reasonable and statistically valid manner.

(3) If the franchisor disapproves of a previously approved claim following an audit, the franchisor shall provide to the franchisee,
 within 30 days after the audit, a written disapproval notice stating the specific grounds upon which the claim is disapproved. The franchisor shall provide a reasonable appeal process allowing the franchisee a reasonable period of not less than 30 days after receipt of the written disapproval notice to respond to any disapproval with additional supporting documentation or information rebutting the disapproval and to cure any material noncompliance, with the period to be commensurate with the volume of claims under consideration. If the franchisee rebuts any disapproval and cures any material noncompliance relating to a claim before the applicable deadline, the franchisor shall not chargeback the franchisee for that claim.

(4) If the franchisee provides additional supporting documentation or information purporting to rebut
 the disapproval, attempts to cure noncompliance relating to the claim, or otherwise appeals denial of the claim, and the franchisor continues to deny the claim, the franchisor shall provide the franchisee with a written notification of the final denial within 30 days of completion of the appeal process, which shall conspicuously state “Final Denial” on the first page.

(5) The franchisor shall not chargeback the franchisee until 45 days after the franchisee receives the written notice described in paragraph (3) or (4), whichever is later. If the franchisee cures any material noncompliance relating to a claim, the franchisor shall not chargeback the dealer for that claim. Any chargeback to a franchisee for incentive program compensation shall be made within 90 days after the franchisee receives that written notice. If the board
 sustains the chargeback or the protest is dismissed, the franchisor shall have 90 days following issuance of the final order or the dismissal to make the chargeback, unless otherwise provided in a settlement agreement.

(6) Within six months after either receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (3) or (4), a franchisee may file a protest with the board for determination of whether the franchisor complied with this subdivision. If the franchisee files a protest pursuant to this subdivision prior to the franchisor’s chargeback for denied claims, the franchisor shall not offset or otherwise undertake to collect the chargeback until the board issues a final order on the protest. In any protest pursuant to this subdivision, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof.

(h) If a false claim was submitted by a franchisee with the intent to defraud the franchisor, a longer period for audit and any resulting chargeback may be permitted if the franchisor obtains an order from the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 512, Sec. 14.   (SB 155)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3065.2.

(a) A franchisee seeking to establish or modify its retail labor rate, retail parts rate, or both, to determine a reasonable warranty reimbursement schedule shall, no more frequently than once per calendar year, complete the following requirements:

(1) The franchisee shall submit in writing to the franchisor whichever of the following is fewer in number:

(A) Any 100 consecutive qualified repair orders completed, including any nonqualified repair orders completed in the same period.

(B) All repair orders completed in any 90-consecutive-day period.

(2) The franchisee shall
 calculate its retail labor rate by determining the total charges for labor from the qualified repair orders submitted and dividing that amount by the total number of hours that generated those charges.

(3) The franchisee shall calculate its retail parts rate by determining the total charges for parts from the qualified repair orders submitted, dividing that amount by the franchisee’s total cost of the purchase of those parts, subtracting one, and multiplying by 100 to produce a percentage.

(4) The franchisee shall provide notice to the franchisor of its retail labor rate and retail parts rate calculated in accordance with this subdivision.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), qualified repair orders submitted under this subdivision shall be from a period occurring not more than 180 days before the submission. Repair
 orders submitted pursuant to this section may be transmitted electronically. A franchisee may submit either of the following:

(1) A single set of qualified repair orders for purposes of calculating both its retail labor rate and its retail parts rate.

(2) A set of qualified repair orders for purposes of calculating only its retail labor rate or only its retail parts rate.

(c) Charges included in a repair order arising from any of the following shall be omitted in calculating the retail labor rate and retail parts rate under this section:

(1) Manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch special events, specials, or promotional discounts for retail customer repairs.

(2) Parts sold, or repairs performed, at wholesale.

(3) Routine maintenance, including, but not limited to, the replacement of bulbs, fluids, filters, batteries, and belts that are not provided in the course of, and related to, a repair.

(4) Items that do not have individual part numbers including, but not limited to, nuts, bolts, and fasteners.

(5) Vehicle reconditioning.

(6) Accessories.

(7) Repairs of conditions caused by a collision, a road hazard, the force of the elements, vandalism, theft, or owner, operational, or third-party negligence or deliberate act.

(8) Parts sold or repairs performed for insurance
 carriers.

(9) Vehicle emission inspections required by law.

(10) Manufacturer-approved goodwill or policy repairs or replacements.

(11) Repairs for government agencies or service contract providers.

(12) Repairs with aftermarket parts, when calculating the retail parts rate, but not the retail labor rate.

(13) Repairs on aftermarket parts.

(14) Replacement of or work on tires, including front-end alignments and wheel or tire rotations.

(15) Repairs of motor vehicles owned by the franchisee or an employee thereof at the time of the repair.

(d) (1) A franchisor may contest to the franchisee the material accuracy of the retail labor rate or retail parts rate that was calculated by the franchisee under this section within 30 days after receiving notice from the franchisee or, if the franchisor requests supplemental repair orders pursuant to paragraph (4), within 30 days after receiving the supplemental repair orders. If the franchisor seeks to contest the retail labor rate, retail parts rate, or both, the franchisor shall submit no more than one notification to the franchisee. The notification shall be limited to an assertion that the rate is materially inaccurate or fraudulent, and shall provide a full explanation of any and all reasons for the allegation, evidence substantiating the franchisor’s position, a copy of all calculations used by the franchisor in determining the franchisor’s position, and a proposed adjusted retail labor rate or retail parts rate, as
 applicable, on the basis of the repair orders submitted by the franchisee or, if applicable, on the basis provided in paragraph (5). After submitting the notification, the franchisor shall not add to, expand, supplement, or otherwise modify any element of that notification, including, but not limited to, its grounds for contesting the retail labor rate, retail parts rate, or both, without justification. A franchisor shall not deny the franchisee’s submission for the retail labor rate, retail parts rate, or both, under subdivision (a).

(2) If the franchisee agrees with the conclusions of the franchisor and any corresponding adjustment to the retail labor rate or retail parts rate, no further action shall be required. The new adjusted rate shall be deemed effective as of the 30th calendar day after the franchisor’s receipt of the notice submitted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) In
 the event the franchisor provides all of the information required by paragraph (1) to the franchisee, and the franchisee does not agree with the adjusted rate proposed by the franchisor, the franchisor shall pay the franchisee at the franchisor’s proposed adjusted retail labor rate or retail parts rate until a decision is rendered upon any board protest filed pursuant to Section 3065.4 or until any mutual resolution between the franchisor and the franchisee. The franchisor’s proposed adjusted rate shall be deemed to be effective as of the 30th day after the franchisor’s receipt of the notice submitted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(4) If the franchisor determines from the franchisee’s set of repair orders submitted pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) that the franchisee’s submission for a retail labor rate or retail parts rate is substantially higher than the franchisee’s current warranty rate, the franchisor may request, in writing, within 30
 days after the franchisor’s receipt of the notice submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), all repair orders closed within the period of 30 days immediately preceding, or 30 days immediately following, the set of repair orders submitted by the franchisee. If the franchisee fails to provide the supplemental repair orders, all time periods under this section shall be suspended until the supplemental repair orders are provided.

(5) If the franchisor requests supplemental repair orders pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (4), the franchisor may calculate a proposed adjusted retail labor rate or retail parts rate, as applicable, based upon any set of the qualified repair orders submitted by the franchisee, if the franchisor complies with all of the following requirements:

(A) The franchisor uses the same requirements applicable to the franchisee’s submission pursuant to paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (a).

(B) The franchisor uses the formula to calculate retail labor rate or retail parts as provided in subdivision (a).

(C) The franchisor omits all charges in the repair orders as provided in subdivision (c).

(e) If the franchisor does not contest the retail labor rate or retail parts rate that was calculated by the franchisee, or if the franchisor fails to contest the rate pursuant to subdivision (d), within 30 days after receiving the notice submitted by the franchisee pursuant to subdivision (a), the uncontested retail labor rate or retail parts rate shall take effect on the 30th day after the franchisor’s receipt of the notice and the franchisor shall use the new retail labor rate or retail parts rate, or both, if applicable, to determine compensation to fulfill warranty obligations to the franchisee
 pursuant to this section.

(f) When calculating the retail parts rate and retail labor rate, all of the following shall apply:

(1) Promotional reward program cash-equivalent pay methods shall not be considered discounts.

(2) (A) The franchisor is prohibited from establishing or implementing a special part or component number for parts used in warranty work, if the result of the special part or component lowers compensation to the franchisee below that amount calculated pursuant to this section.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to parts or components that are subject to a recall and are issued a new special part or component number. This paragraph does not prohibit a franchisor from changing prices of parts in the ordinary course of
 business.

(g) When the franchisor is compensating the franchisee for the retail parts rate, all of the following shall apply:

(1) If the franchisor furnishes a part to a franchisee at no cost for use in performing warranty obligations, the franchisor shall compensate the franchisee the amount resulting from multiplying the wholesale value of the part by the franchisee’s retail parts rate determined pursuant to this section.

(2) If the franchisor furnishes a part to a franchisee at a reduced cost for use in performing warranty obligations, the franchisor shall compensate the franchisee the amount resulting from multiplying the wholesale value of the part by the franchisee’s retail parts rate determined pursuant to this section, plus the franchisee’s cost of the part.

(3) The wholesale value of the part, for purposes of this subdivision, shall be the greater of:

(A) The amount the franchisee paid for the part or a substantially identical part if already owned by the franchisee.

(B) The cost of the part shown in a current franchisor’s established price schedule.

(C) The cost of a substantially identical part shown in a current franchisor’s established price schedule.

(h) When a franchisee submits for the establishment or modification of a retail labor rate, retail parts rate, or both, pursuant to this section, a franchisee’s retail labor rate or retail parts rate shall be calculated only using the method prescribed in this section. When a franchisee submits for the establishment or modification of a
 retail labor rate, retail parts rate, or both, pursuant to this section, a franchisor shall not use, or require a franchisee to use, any other method, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Substituting any other purported repair sample for that submitted by a franchisee.

(2) Imposing any method related to the establishment of a retail labor rate or retail parts rate that is unreasonable or time consuming, or require the use of information that is unreasonable or time consuming to obtain, including part-by-part or transaction-by-transaction calculations or utilization of the franchisee’s financial statement.

(3) Unilaterally calculating a retail labor rate or retail parts rate for a franchisee, except as provided in subdivision (d).

(4) Using a franchisee’s sample, submitted for establishing or increasing its retail parts rate, to establish or reduce the franchisee’s retail labor rate or using a franchisee’s sample, submitted for establishing or increasing its retail labor rate, to establish or reduce the franchisee’s retail parts rate.

(i) A franchisor shall not do any of the following:

(1) Attempt to influence a franchisee to implement or change the prices for which the franchisee sells parts or labor in retail repairs because the franchisee is seeking compensation or exercising any right pursuant to this section.

(2) Directly or indirectly, take or threaten to take any adverse action against a franchisee for seeking compensation or exercising any right pursuant to this section, by any action including, but not limited to, the
 following:

(A) Assessing penalties, surcharges, or similar costs to a franchisee.

(B) Transferring or shifting any costs to a franchisee.

(C) Limiting allocation of vehicles or parts to a franchisee.

(D) Failing to act other than in good faith.
